Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 1

Establishment

16-15-101. Establishment — Certain counties excepted.

There is created and established a court in and for each county of the state, except in counties having a population of not less than nine thousand one hundred seventy-five (9,175) nor more than nine thousand two hundred (9,200), according to the last federal census or any subsequent federal census, which shall be designated as the court of general sessions.

It is the intent of this section to create a general sessions court in every county not expressly excepted in this section. In any county where a general sessions court has been created pursuant to the general provisions of this chapter, it is intended that the county shall always have a general sessions court unless abolished by another general statute. In counties in which there is no court of general sessions as provided in this section, references in this code to the court of general sessions are deemed to include the court having the jurisdiction of the court of general sessions in such counties.

Acts 1959, ch. 109, §§ 1, 22; 1959, ch. 255, § 1; 1959, ch. 265, § 1; 1961, ch. 30, § 1; 1961, ch. 51, § 1; 1961, ch. 188, § 1; 1963, ch. 307, §§ 1, 2; 1965, ch. 116, § 1; 1974, ch. 507, § 1; 1976, ch. 738, § 1; 1979, ch. 68, § 1; T.C.A., § 16-1101; Acts 1998, ch. 573, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Power of general assembly to create courts, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 7.1.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, §§ 2, 4.

Law Reviews.

Don't miss a move. Making rules 5 and 5.1 work for your clients in General Sessions Court (Robert Little), 37 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2001).

Effective Minor Courts — Key to Court Modernization, (James G. France), 40 Tenn. L. Rev. 29.

The Impossible Balance: A Tennessee judge makes the case for abolishing state's part-time judgeships (Judge James L. Cotton Jr.), 37 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2001).

Cited: Crawford v. Gilpatrick, 646 S.W.2d 433, 1983 Tenn. LEXIS 608 (Tenn. 1983); Sexton v. Sevier County, 948 S.W.2d 747, 1997 Tenn. App. LEXIS 71 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1997).

16-15-102. Courtroom — Supplies and equipment — Expenses.

Each county shall provide a courtroom for the general sessions court in the county seat and all necessary supplies and equipment for the maintenance of the court and shall defray the expenses thereof from the general fund of the county.

In counties having a population of not less than thirteen thousand two hundred seventy-five (13,275) nor more than thirteen thousand two hundred ninety-five (13,295) and not less than fourteen thousand six hundred fifty (14,650) nor more than fourteen thousand six hundred seventy (14,670), according to the federal census of 1960 and every subsequent federal census, the general sessions judges shall be entitled to secretarial and office expenses in the amount of six hundred dollars ($600) per annum, payable monthly from the general funds of such counties.

In counties having a population of not less than twenty-four thousand two hundred twenty (24,220) nor more than twenty-four thousand two hundred thirty-five (24,235) or not less than twelve thousand five hundred (12,500) nor more than twelve thousand six hundred (12,600), according to the 1960 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the general sessions judge shall be entitled to an allowance of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per annum, for secretarial and office expenses and the same shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the counties.

In counties of this state having a population of not less than twenty-four thousand five hundred seventy (24,570) nor more than twenty-four thousand five hundred eighty (24,580), according to the 1960 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the general sessions judge shall be entitled to an allowance of one thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,800) per annum for secretarial and office expenses, to be paid in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 1; 1961, ch. 146, § 1; 1961, ch. 279, § 1; 1965, ch. 366, § 1; 1968, ch. 430, § 1; T.C.A., § 16-1102.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — General Sessions Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 375.

16-15-103. Holding court at places other than county seat.

The county legislative body of each county shall be authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to require the court of general sessions to meet at not more than three (3) places in the county in addition to the county seat, to prescribe the place or places of meeting of the court, and to provide a courtroom, equipment and furnishings at such other places in the county in addition to the county seat for the sessions of the court.

Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 16-1103.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 2.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — General Sessions Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 375.

Collateral References.

Place of holding sessions of trial court as affecting validity of its proceedings. 18 A.L.R.3d 572.